Massachusetts, session 194th, H3432.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of the state
auditor shall conduct a comprehensive audit of the department of unemployment assistance to
determine the level of unemployment fraud that has taken place during the 2019 novel
coronavirus pandemic, also known as COVID-19. The audit shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) a review and examination of the policies and procedures of the department of unemployment
assistance to prevent and address unemployment fraud; (2) a review of any and all costs to the
state and taxpayers due to unemployment fraud during the course of the pandemic; and (3) any
recommendations regarding how to improve the department of unemployment’s policies to
prevent unemployment fraud.
of 2

The department of the state auditor shall publish a report of its findings and make the
report available to the public not later than December 31, 2026.
of 2